Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Groundwater Monitoring

151.620.
Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds that groundwater makes up over ninety-five percent (95%) of the water resources in Kentucky. Groundwater accounts for over thirty percent (30%) of the public and domestic water supplies in the Commonwealth, and up to ninety percent (90%) of all rural domestic supplies, and is the major source of water to streams. It is imperative that a system for characterizing and monitoring groundwater be developed so that information acquired through various monitoring programs will allow Kentucky to identify and characterize the groundwater resource. The information from the monitoring network can be used to enhance the Kentucky Groundwater Data Repository; identify, characterize, and model groundwater systems; develop community and private water supplies; address resource allocation concerns; set boundaries on wellhead protection areas; recognize groundwater degradation if it occurs; and evaluate and improve the quality and quantity of data collected through all programs.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 30, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

151.621.
Definitions for KRS 151.620 to 151.629.

As used in KRS 151.620 to 151.629, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Committee” means the Interagency Technical Advisory Committee on Groundwater as created in KRS 151.629;

“Groundwater resource” means groundwater that is currently being used or is capable of being used;

“Groundwater system” means a body of groundwater that is separated from other bodies of groundwater either by flow characteristics including but not limited to flow direction, flow speed, permeability, or storativity, or by water chemistry or layers of rock;

“KGS” means the Kentucky Geological Survey; and

“Monitoring network” means a series of wells, springs, and associated surface water that will be tested on a periodic basis for water level, discharge, and water chemistry.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 30, § 2, effective July 15, 1998.

151.625.
Establishment of long-term groundwater monitoring network — Duties.

The KGS shall, in cooperation with the Interagency Technical Advisory Committee on Groundwater, establish a long-term groundwater monitoring network for the purpose of characterizing the quality, quantity, and distribution of Kentucky’s groundwater resources.

The monitoring network shall include:

Representative sites sampled by various agencies;

Water wells, springs, and surface water associated with wells and springs; and

New monitoring wells installed in areas of demonstrated need.

The KGS shall utilize collected data to support research efforts that develop models for groundwater systems, and to determine and monitor trends of groundwater movement, water quality, and quantity.

The KGS shall provide data from the network to the Kentucky Groundwater Data Repository and make the data readily available to the public, government agencies, industry, and other entities that request access. Analyzed data may be made available in the form of maps, charts, bulletins, and reports.

The KGS shall solicit input from federal, state, and local agencies, and industry, agriculture, universities, and the public to determine priority monitoring locations based on water quality and quantity concerns as the network is developed.

Within ninety (90) days of the end of each state fiscal year, the KGS shall provide to the Governor and the Legislative Research Commission a summary of the groundwater monitoring network data collection and analysis activities.

This network shall collect information on a statewide basis and provide long-term data collection to determine the quality, quantity, and occurrence of groundwater throughout the Commonwealth.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 30, § 3, effective July 15, 1998.

151.629.
Interagency Technical Advisory Committee on Groundwater — Duties and responsibilities.

There is established an Interagency Technical Advisory Committee on Groundwater to assist the KGS in the development, coordination, and implementation of a groundwater monitoring network for the Commonwealth. The committee shall consist of one (1) representative from each of the following agencies, to be appointed by that agency:

Division of Conservation of the Department for Natural Resources;

Division of Public Health Protection and Safety of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;

Division of Forestry of the Department for Natural Resources;

Division of Environmental Services of the Department of Agriculture;

Division of Waste Management of the Department for Environmental Protection;

Division of Water of the Department for Environmental Protection;

Department for Environmental Protection;

Department for Natural Resources;

Kentucky Geological Survey;

University of Kentucky College of Agriculture; and

University of Kentucky Water Resources Research Institute.

The committee shall have two (2) nonvoting legislative liaisons who shall be members of the General Assembly. One (1) liaison shall be a House member appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives and one (1) liaison shall be a Senate member appointed by the President of the Senate. The chair of the committee shall be the director of the University of Kentucky Water Resources Research Institute. The duties and responsibilities of the committee shall include:

Developing a plan to coordinate agencies for the overall characterization of the state’s groundwater, including occurrence, flow systems, water quantity, and water quality;

Reviewing the data entry process to ensure that all data collected is placed into the Kentucky Groundwater Data Repository;

Establishing a long-term groundwater monitoring plan for the Commonwealth;

Making recommendations for prioritization of the state’s groundwater research needs; and

Annually reviewing and evaluating groundwater data collection and analysis.

In addition to the members identified in subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the committee may have, as one (1) of its members, one (1) nonvoting representative from the United States Geological Survey, appointed by that agency.

History.
Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 30, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 2004, ch. 88, § 2, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 99, § 122, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 123, § 18, effective June 20, 2005.